dictionaries/hsb/hsb.dic
dopřemyslić/NIZ
čěrnyć/NEZ
dojěchać/NAZ
přećěrić/NIZ
šiknyć/NZE
šusknyć/NZE
ćahnyć/NLM
błysknyć/NZE
chilić/NIZ
dožrać/NEZ
doćahnyć/NZL
doběhnyć/NZE
dodźiwać/NAZ
dočaknyć/NZE
dohotowić/NIZ
dokidnyć/NZE
dokusać/NAZ
domlěć/NCFZ
dopadnyć/NZE
dopředać/RNZ
dopóznać/NCZ
dorozebrać/NEZ
dosłapnyć/NZE
dosćahnyć/NZL
doskónčić/NIZ
dosrěbać/NAZ
doswjećić/NIZ
dotorhać/NAZ
dowarić/NIZ
dowobalić/NIZ
dowoteznać/NCZ
dowučinić/NIZ
dowutupić/NIZ
dozjednać/NAZ
dychnyć/NZE
hacnyć/NZE
hwizdnyć/NZE
klepnyć/NZE
kuknyć/NZE
lahnyć/NML
linyć/NZE
misnyć/NZE
našćěpić/NIZ
našwikać/NAZ
naćahać/NAZ
naćahnyć/NZL
nabrać/NEZ
nadać/RNZ
nadrapać/NAZ
nadychać/NAZ
nahnić/NCZ
nahromadźić/NIZ
nakidać/NAZ
nakrjepić/NIZ
nalahnyć/NZL
nalakować/NEXZ
nalutować/NEZ
naměć/NEZ
namrěć/NCFZ
napadnyć/NZE
naplaćić/NIZ
napojić/NIZ
napróšić/NIZ
narěčeć/NIZ
narypać/NAZ
nasmalić/NIZ
nastajić/NIZ
nasydać/NAZ
natorhać/NAZ
nawabić/NIZ
nawjadnyć/NZE
naworać/NAZ
nazwučować/NEXZ
pachnyć/NZE
plusknyć/NZE
poškarać/NAZ
połoskotać/NEZ
poćahać/NAZL
poćahnyć/NZL
přahnyć/NLM
pobachtać/NAZ
pobrać/NEZ
pochwatać/NAZ
podźělić/NIZ
podchłódnić/NIZ
podkopać/NAZ
podmurjować/NEXZ
podrěmać/NAZ
podryć/NCZ
podwojić/NIZ
přežwjenkać/NAZ
přełamać/NAZ
přećahnyć/NZL
počakać/NAZ
přebrać/NEZ
přecydźić/NIZ
předčuć/NCZ
předpołožić/NIZ
předtwarić/NIZ
přečušlić/NIZ
přehladnyć/NZE
přehrěć/NCZ
překapnyć/NZE
překlusnyć/NZE
překrawić/NIZ
přelećeć/NIZ
přeměšeć/NAZ
přemóžić/NIZ
přenajeć/NAZ
přepławić/NIZ
přepjelnić/NIZ
přepřahnyć/NLZ
přepóznać/NCZ
přepytać/NAZ
přerubać/NAZ
přesćahnyć/NZL
přesćahować/NEZ
přeslědźić/NIZ
přestorčić/NIZ
přeswědčić/NIZ
přetłóčić/NIZ
přetrać/NCZ
počuchać/NAZ
přewětrić/NIZ
přeworać/NAZ
přezhibnyć/NZE
pohibać/NAZ
pohóršić/NIZ
přižohnować/NEXZ
přićahać/NAZ
přićahnyć/NZL
přibližić/NIZ
přidać/RNZ
přihrać/NCZ
přiklepać/NAZ
přikryć/NCZ
přiměšeć/NAZ
přinóžkować/NEXZ
připadnyć/NZE
připołožić/NIZ
připósłać/NEZ
připućować/NEZ
přiselić/NIZ
přistajić/NIZ
přisypać/NAZ
přitwjerdźić/NIZ
přiwdać/RNZ
přiwodźěć/NCZ
přizamknyć/NZE
pojednać/NAZ
pokřižować/NEXZ
pokupić/NIZ
pomasnyć/NZE
pomjetać/NEZ
ponowić/NIZ
popluskać/NAZ
popryskać/NAZ
porodźić/NIZ
posłodźić/NIZ
poslěbornić/NIZ
pospeć/NIZ
postotorić/NIZ
posyć/NCZ
pótknyć/NZE
potwjerdźić/NIZ
powitać/NAZ
powodźić/NIZ
powučić/NIZ
pozhubić/NIZ
pušćić/NIZ
rjeknyć/NZE
rozšćěpić/NIZ
rozšmjatać/NEZ
rozćahnyć/NZL
rozćoplić/NIZ
rozbudźić/NIZ
rozdajić/NIZ
rozdwojić/NIZ
rozesłać/NEZ
rozhladać/NAZ
rozhrěć/NCZ
rozkałnyć/NZE
rozknoćić/NIZ
rozkulić/NIZ
rozličić/NIZ
rozměsćić/NIZ
rozmodźić/NIZ
rozpłakać/NAZ
rozpačić/NIZ
rozpjerchać/NAZ
rozpołčić/NIZ
rozporkać/NAZ
rozprawić/NIZ
rozpukać/NAZ
rozrjadować/NEXZ
rozsedźeć/NIZ
rozswěćić/NIZ
rozsypać/NAZ
roztočić/NIZ
roztrušić/NIZ
rozwěšeć/NAZ
rozworać/NAZ
sćahać/NAZ
sćahnyć/NZL
sćěsnić/NIZ
schmjelić/NIZ
sciwilizować/NEZ
sčornić/NIZ
sformulować/NEZ
skazać/NEZ
sklipnyć/NZE
skřemjenić/NIZ
skomdźić/NIZ
skonkretizować/NEZ
skostnyć/NZE
skućić/NIZ
skusać/NAZ
spławić/NIZ
spakosćić/NIZ
spasować/NEZ
spjerchotać/NEZ
spodobnić/NIZ
spřeměnjować/NEZ
spójšeć/NAZ
spopjelić/NIZ
spowalować/NEZ
sprosćić/NIZ
stłóčić/NIZ
střělić/NIZ
stróžić/NIZ
stwarić/NIZ
sydnyć/NZE
torhnyć/NZE
wjerhnyć/NZE
wožahnyć/NZL
wožlokać/NAZ
wošudźić/NIZ
woćichnyć/NZE
wobškodźić/NIZ
wobćahnyć/NLZ
wobbić/NCZ
wobdarić/NIZ
wobhladać/NAZ
wobjasnić/NIZ
wobkružić/NIZ
woblehnyć/NZE
woblizać/NEZ
wobmyslić/NIZ
wobrězać/NEZ
wobsadźić/NIZ
wobstać/NZ
wobsyć/NCZ
wobtyknyć/NZE
wobwěsnyć/NZE
wocokorić/NIZ
wodušnić/NIZ
wočisćić/NIZ
wohidźić/NIZ
wohrodźić/NIZ
wokmanić/NIZ
wokrjepić/NIZ
womazać/NEZ
woněmčić/NIZ
wopłakać/NAZ
wopadnyć/NZE
wopluskać/NAZ
wopomnić/NIZ
wopuchnyć/NZE
wosłódčić/NIZ
woslepić/NIZ
wospěšnić/NIZ
wosušić/NIZ
wosylnić/NIZ
wotšćipnyć/NZE
wotštapać/NAZ
wotćahnyć/NZL
wotćišćeć/NIZ
wotbočić/NIZ
wotcydźić/NIZ
wotduć/NCZ
wotčitać/NAZ
wothódnoćić/NIZ
wotkłóć/NCFZ
wotkidać/NAZ
wotkosmić/NIZ
wotlemić/NIZ
wotliznyć/NZE
wotmjelknyć/NZE
wotmórać/NAZ
wotpławić/NIZ
wotpalić/NIZ
wotpołožić/NIZ
wotpřahnyć/NLZ
wotpokazać/NEZ
wotpóznać/NCZ
wotpróć/NCFZ
wotrězać/NEZ
wotrysować/NEXZ
wotskorić/NIZ
wotsudźić/NIZ
wottać/NCZ
wottrěć/NCFZ
wotučnić/NIZ
wotwěć/NCZ
wotwodźěć/NCZ
wotzjewić/NIZ
wozelenić/NIZ
wužłobić/NIZ
wužlokać/NAZ
wušiplić/NIZ
wušparać/NAZ
wućahnyć/NZL
wubetonować/NEXZ
wubledźić/NIZ
wuchłódnić/NIZ
wucychnować/NEZ
wudać/RNZ
wudokonjeć/NAZ
wuduć/NCZ
wučerpać/NAZ
wučuć/NCZ
wufukować/NEZ
wuhewrjekać/NAZ
wuhojić/NIZ
wuhrjebać/NAZ
wujěsć/RNZ
wukazać/NEZ
wuklinčeć/NIZ
wukołsać/NAZ
wukorjenić/NIZ
wukrawić/NIZ
wukurić/NIZ
wulahnyć/NZL
wulemić/NIZ
wulěpić/NIZ
wumasać/NAZ
wumjetać/NEZ
wumyć/NCZ
wunuzować/NEZ
wupłoknyć/NZE
wupalić/NIZ
wupinyć/NZE
wupjerchotać/NEZ
wuplunyć/NZE
wupřahnyć/NZL
wupomhać/NAZ
wupowěsnyć/NZE
wuprasnyć/NZE
wuprysknyć/NZE
wurejować/NEZ
wurjeknyć/NEZ
wusłać/NEZ
wusahnyć/NZE
wuskoržić/NIZ
wusmorkać/NAZ
wuspać/NIZ
wusrać/NEZ
wustrachować/NEZ
wusušić/NIZ
wuswikać/NAZ
wusydnyć/NZE
wutřihać/NAZ
wutrjebać/NAZ
wutworić/NIZ
wuwěšćić/NIZ
wuwisać/NAZ
wuwołać/NAZ
wuwróćić/NIZ
wuzamołwić/NIZ
wuznać/NCZ
wuzynčeć/NIZ
złójić/NIZ
zažrać/NEZ
zašćuwać/NAZ
zaškrabać/NAZ
zašlipnyć/NZE
zašwórčeć/NIZ
zaćahnyć/NZL
zaćišćeć/NIZ
zabłysknyć/NZE
zaběhnyć/NZE
zacementować/NEXZ
zadźernyć/NZE
zadomić/NIZ
zadwělować/NEXZ
začopić/NIZ
zahłódnić/NIZ
zahladać/NAZ
zahrabnyć/NZE
zahuslować/NEZ
zakłapać/NAZ
zakantorić/NIZ
zakiwkotać/NEZ
zakołsać/NAZ
zakopnyć/NZE
zakročić/NIZ
zakwičeć/NIZ
zalodowčić/NIZ
zamazać/NEZ
zaměstnić/NIZ
zamochtać/NAZ
zamylić/NIZ
zapłakać/NAZ
zapadnyć/NZE
zapincować/NEXZ
zapjeńčić/NIZ
zaplombować/NEXZ
zapřahnyć/NZL
zapřisahać/NAZ
zapósłać/NEZ
zaprasknyć/NZE
zapusćić/NIZ
zarěčeć/NIZ
zarubać/NAZ
zasłapić/NIZ
zasahnyć/NZE
zaschnyć/NCZ
zaslubić/NIZ
zasparnić/NIZ
zastać/TNZ
zastyskać/NAZ
zasydlić/NIZ
zatłusnyć/NZE
zatřichnyć/NZE
zatwarić/NIZ
zawalić/NIZ
zawěsnyć/NZE
zawohladać/NAZ
zawrěć/NCFZ
zazbčhać/NAZ
zazynčeć/NIZ
zbělić/NIZ
zbrašić/NIZ
zdźěłać/NAZ
zdeformować/NEZ
zdobywać/NAZ
zdrapnyć/NZE
zdunyć/NZE
zežiwić/NIZ
zešědźiwić/NIZ
zešwikać/NAZ
zelektrifikować/NEZ
zesłabnyć/NZE
zeskubać/NAZ
zesrěbać/NAZ
zesukać/NAZ
zewšědnić/NIZ
zezapójšeć/NAZ
zezběrać/NAZ
zhładźić/NIZ
zhinašić/NIZ
zhonić/NIZ
zhrěšić/NIZ
zhustnyć/NZE
zjězdźić/NIZ
zlěpšić/NIZ
zmechanizować/NEZ
zminyć/NZE
zmjerwić/NIZ
zmučnić/NIZ
znarodnić/NIZ
znješwarnić/NIZ
znjewužić/NCZ
zrealizować/NEZ
zrjadkować/NEZ
zrozmjetować/NEZ
zuć/NCZ
zwarnować/NEZ
zwěrować/NEZ
zwjetšić/NIZ
zwobwěšeć/NAZ
zwopłokować/NEZ
zwotlětować/NEZ
zwróćić/NIZ
zwućahnyć/NZL
zwubrać/NEZ
zwupřestrěć/NCFZ
